Illinois, session 104th, HB4234.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 and by adding Section 10.28 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/7)7    Sec. 7. Rules and standards for schools. The Board shall 8adopt rules and minimum standards for such schools which shall 9include, but not be limited to, the following:10        a. The curriculum for probationary law enforcement 11    officers which shall be offered by all certified schools 12    shall include, but not be limited to, courses of 13    procedural justice, arrest and use and control tactics, 14    search and seizure, including temporary questioning, civil 15    rights, human rights, human relations, cultural 16    competency, including implicit bias and racial and ethnic 17    sensitivity, criminal law, law of criminal procedure, 18    constitutional and proper use of law enforcement 19    authority, crisis intervention training, vehicle and 20    traffic law including uniform and non-discriminatory 21    enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code, traffic control 22    and crash investigation, techniques of obtaining physical 23    evidence, court testimonies, statements, reports, firearms   HB4234- 2 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    training, training in the use of electronic control 2    devices, including the psychological and physiological 3    effects of the use of those devices on humans, first aid 4    (including cardiopulmonary resuscitation), training in the 5    administration of opioid antagonists as defined in 6    paragraph (1) of subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the 7    Substance Use Disorder Act, handling of juvenile 8    offenders, recognition of mental conditions and crises, 9    including, but not limited to, the disease of addiction, 10    which require immediate assistance and response and 11    methods to safeguard and provide assistance to a person in 12    need of mental treatment, recognition of abuse, neglect, 13    financial exploitation, and self-neglect of adults with 14    disabilities and older adults, as defined in Section 2 of 15    the Adult Protective Services Act, crimes against the 16    elderly, law of evidence, the hazards of high-speed police 17    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 18    high-speed chase, and physical training. The curriculum 19    shall include a block of instruction addressing 20    trauma-informed programs, procedures, and practices meant 21    to minimize traumatization of the victim. The curriculum 22    shall include specific training in techniques for 23    immediate response to and investigation of cases of 24    domestic violence and of sexual assault of adults and 25    children, including cultural perceptions and common myths 26    of sexual assault and sexual abuse as well as interview   HB4234- 3 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    techniques that are age sensitive and are trauma informed, 2    victim centered, and victim sensitive. The curriculum 3    shall include training in techniques designed to promote 4    effective communication at the initial contact with crime 5    victims and ways to comprehensively explain to victims and 6    witnesses their rights under the Rights of Crime Victims 7    and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 8    The curriculum shall also include training in effective 9    recognition of and responses to stress, trauma, and 10    post-traumatic stress experienced by law enforcement 11    officers that is consistent with Section 25 of the 12    Illinois Mental Health First Aid Training Act in a peer 13    setting, including recognizing signs and symptoms of 14    work-related cumulative stress, issues that may lead to 15    suicide, and solutions for intervention with peer support 16    resources. The curriculum shall include a block of 17    instruction addressing the mandatory reporting 18    requirements under the Abused and Neglected Child 19    Reporting Act. The curriculum shall also include a block 20    of instruction aimed at identifying and interacting with 21    persons with autism and other developmental or physical 22    disabilities, reducing barriers to reporting crimes 23    against persons with autism, and addressing the unique 24    challenges presented by cases involving victims or 25    witnesses with autism and other developmental 26    disabilities. The curriculum shall include training in the   HB4234- 4 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    detection and investigation of all forms of human 2    trafficking. The curriculum shall also include instruction 3    in trauma-informed responses designed to ensure the 4    physical safety and well-being of a child of an arrested 5    parent or immediate family member; this instruction must 6    include, but is not limited to: (1) understanding the 7    trauma experienced by the child while maintaining the 8    integrity of the arrest and safety of officers, suspects, 9    and other involved individuals; (2) de-escalation tactics 10    that would include the use of force when reasonably 11    necessary; and (3) inquiring whether a child will require 12    supervision and care. The curriculum for probationary law 13    enforcement officers shall include: (1) at least 12 hours 14    of hands-on, scenario-based role-playing; (2) at least 6 15    hours of instruction on use of force techniques, including 16    the use of de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce 17    the need for force whenever safe and feasible; (3) 18    specific training on officer safety techniques, including 19    cover, concealment, and time; and (4) at least 6 hours of 20    training focused on high-risk traffic stops. The 21    curriculum for permanent law enforcement officers shall 22    include, but not be limited to: (1) refresher and 23    in-service training in any of the courses listed above in 24    this subparagraph, (2) advanced courses in any of the 25    subjects listed above in this subparagraph, (3) training 26    for supervisory personnel, and (4) specialized training in   HB4234- 5 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    subjects and fields to be selected by the board. The 2    training in the use of electronic control devices shall be 3    conducted for probationary law enforcement officers, 4    including University police officers. The curriculum shall 5    also include training on the use of a firearms restraining 6    order by providing instruction on the process used to file 7    a firearms restraining order and how to identify 8    situations in which a firearms restraining order is 9    appropriate.10        b. Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements 11    and equipment requirements.12        c. Minimum requirements for instructors.13        d. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 14    probationary law enforcement officer must satisfactorily 15    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 16    a local law enforcement officer for a participating local 17    governmental or State governmental agency. Those 18    requirements shall include training in first aid 19    (including cardiopulmonary resuscitation).20        e. Minimum basic training requirements, which a 21    probationary county corrections officer must 22    satisfactorily complete before being eligible for 23    permanent employment as a county corrections officer for a 24    participating local governmental agency.25        f. Minimum basic training requirements which a 26    probationary court security officer must satisfactorily   HB4234- 6 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    complete before being eligible for permanent employment as 2    a court security officer for a participating local 3    governmental agency. The Board shall establish those 4    training requirements which it considers appropriate for 5    court security officers and shall certify schools to 6    conduct that training. 7        A person hired to serve as a court security officer 8    must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting to 9    the officer's successful completion of the training 10    course; (ii) attesting to the officer's satisfactory 11    completion of a training program of similar content and 12    number of hours that has been found acceptable by the 13    Board under the provisions of this Act; or (iii) attesting 14    to the Board's determination that the training course is 15    unnecessary because of the person's extensive prior law 16    enforcement experience.17        Individuals who currently serve as court security 18    officers shall be deemed qualified to continue to serve in 19    that capacity so long as they are certified as provided by 20    this Act within 24 months of June 1, 1997 (the effective 21    date of Public Act 89-685). Failure to be so certified, 22    absent a waiver from the Board, shall cause the officer to 23    forfeit his or her position.24        All individuals hired as court security officers on or 25    after June 1, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 26    89-685) shall be certified within 12 months of the date of   HB4234- 7 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    their hire, unless a waiver has been obtained by the 2    Board, or they shall forfeit their positions.3        The Sheriff's Merit Commission, if one exists, or the 4    Sheriff's Office if there is no Sheriff's Merit 5    Commission, shall maintain a list of all individuals who 6    have filed applications to become court security officers 7    and who meet the eligibility requirements established 8    under this Act. Either the Sheriff's Merit Commission, or 9    the Sheriff's Office if no Sheriff's Merit Commission 10    exists, shall establish a schedule of reasonable intervals 11    for verification of the applicants' qualifications under 12    this Act and as established by the Board.13        g. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a 14    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete every 15    3 years. Those requirements shall include constitutional 16    and proper use of law enforcement authority; procedural 17    justice; civil rights; human rights; reporting child abuse 18    and neglect; autism-informed law enforcement responses, 19    techniques, and procedures; identifying and interacting 20    with individuals with epilepsy; trauma-informed programs, 21    procedures, and practices meant to minimize traumatization 22    of the victim; and cultural competency, including implicit 23    bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity. These trainings 24    shall consist of at least 30 hours of training every 3 25    years.26        h. Minimum in-service training requirements, which a   HB4234- 8 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1    law enforcement officer must satisfactorily complete at 2    least annually. Those requirements shall include law 3    updates, emergency medical response training and 4    certification, crisis intervention training, and officer 5    wellness and mental health.6        i. Minimum in-service training requirements as set 7    forth in Section 10.6.8    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 9changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public Act 10102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022. 11(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-949, eff. 1-1-25; 12104-84, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    (50 ILCS 705/10.28 new)14    Sec. 10.28. Training; epilepsy identification and 15treatment. 16    (a) The Board shall develop or approve a course to assist 17law enforcement officers in identifying and interacting with 18individuals with epilepsy. The course must be fully consistent 19with the best practice guidelines issued by the Centers for 20Disease Control and Prevention.21    (b) The Board shall conduct or approve the epilepsy 22identification and treatment training course no later than 2 23years after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 24104th General Assembly. The Board may consult with the 25Department of Public Health or Department of Human Services to   HB4234- 9 -LRB104 16250 RTM 29634 b1develop and update the curriculum as needed.